Hawaii statutes.
[§353C-8 Sexual assaults in prison.
(a)] The department of public safety, to the best of the department's ability,
shall address sexual assault in prison and make every effort to seek grant
moneys from the federal government to implement those efforts. The department
shall place priority upon establishing:

(1) Appropriate counseling services for sexual
assault, to be made available to victims of prison rape within twenty-four
hours of the report of an assault; and

(2) Policies and standards of transparency to achieve
a zero-tolerance policy for sexual assault.

[(b)] The department of public safety, no
later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, shall
annually report data to the legislature regarding:

(1) Sexual assault by persons in custody against
other persons in custody of the department of public safety;

(2) Sexual assault by correctional staff against
persons in custody of the department of public safety;

(3) Non-criminal sexual misconduct by staff,
including sexual harassment of persons in custody of the department of public
safety;

(4) Criminal cases initiated, and closed by
dismissal, plea, or verdict, for sexual assaults by or upon a person in custody
of the department of public safety; and

(5) Civil claims filed and closed by dismissal,
settlement, or verdict for sexual assaults by or upon a person in custody of
the department of public safety. [L 2010, c 194, §§2, 3]

Revision Note

L 2010, c 194, §§2, 3 were codified to this section pursuant
to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next